Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 2 Power of Officers to Administer Oaths

36-2-1.
Officers with statewide power.

The following persons may administer oaths anywhere within the state: the governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general, assistant attorneys general, general treasurer, active and retired justices of the supreme, superior, family, and district courts, each member of the general assembly after he or she has filed his or her signature with the secretary of state, commissioners appointed by other states to take acknowledgments of deeds and depositions within this state, and notaries public.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 25, § 9; C.P.A. 1905, § 1218; G.L. 1909, ch. 31, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 31, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 491, § 1; P.L. 1945, ch. 1591, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-2-1

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 40; P.L. 1979, ch. 241, § 1.

36-2-2.
Officers with power in county or town.

The following persons may administer oaths within the respective counties and towns for which they may be elected or appointed to office: clerks of courts, justices of the peace, mayors of cities, judges of probate, presidents of town councils, or persons acting as such, town clerks, and town wardens.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 25, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 31, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 31, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 491, § 2; P.L. 1941, ch. 1010, § 2; P.L. 1945, ch. 1591, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

36-2-2

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 40.

36-2-3.
Power in connection with duties of office.

The following persons may administer oath in relation to all matters connected with, or in administering the duties of, their respective offices: the director of each state department, forepersons of grand juries, members of committees of either house of the general assembly or of joint committees thereof, chairpersons of committees of either board of a city council or of joint committees thereof, members of town councils, auditors, referees, masters in chancery, commissioners on insolvent estates, the bank commissioner, the insurance commissioner, the securities commissioner, the tax administrator, the public utilities administrator, assessors of taxes, and other officers as may be authorized by the acts creating their respective offices to administer oaths.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 25, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 31, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 31, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 491, § 3; P.L. 1939, ch. 715, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

36-2-3

.

36-2-4.
Fees for acknowledgments and engagements.

To all officers empowered to take acknowledgments of deeds and administer oaths of engagement to office, there shall be allowed:

For taking acknowledgment of one or more parties to any instrument at one time $ .50 (2) For engaging every officer .25

Click to view

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 295, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 364, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 417, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 633, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

36-2-4

.